Illinois, session 104th, HB3056.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Animal Welfare Act is amended by adding 5Section 18.5 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 605/18.5 new)7    Sec. 18.5. Age limit on the importation of dogs. A 8licensee may not import any dog into the State if the licensee 9knows or has reason to know that the dog is under the age of 8 10weeks old. A licensee must inquire about the age of a dog 11before importing it into the State.